Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Registration Under Military Selective Service Act

§ 25-9-351.
Documentation of selective service registration required prior to employment of males between ages 18 and 26.

Every male between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-six (26) who is required to register under the federal Military Selective Service Act, 50 USCS App. 453, and is seeking employment with the State of Mississippi shall submit to the person, commission, board or agency to which his application is submitted satisfactory documentation of his compliance with the draft registration requirements of the Military Selective Service Act. The documentation shall include a signed affirmation under penalty of perjury that the male applicant has complied with the requirements of the federal selective service act.

Every male between the ages of eighteen (18) and twenty-six (26) who is offered employment with the State of Mississippi shall be prohibited from being employed by the state until he submits the documentation required in subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1999, ch. 411, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.